Utah statutes.
26-18-301.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Community based organization":
(a)  means a private entity; and
(b)  includes for profit and not for profit entities.
(2)  "Cultural competence" means a set of congruent behaviors, attitudes, and
policies that come together in a system, agency, or profession and enables
that system, agency, or profession to work effectively in cross-cultural
situations.
(3)  "Health literacy" means the degree to which an individual has the
capacity to obtain, process, and understand health information and services
needed to make appropriate health decisions.
(4)  "Institutional capacity" means the ability of a community based
organization to implement public and private contracts.
(5)  "Medically underserved population" means the population of an urban or
rural area or a population group designated by the department as having a
shortage of primary health care services.
(6)  "Primary health care" means:
(a)  basic and general health care services given when a person seeks
assistance to screen for or to prevent illness and disease, or for simple and
common illnesses and injuries; and
(b)  care given for the management of chronic diseases.
(7)  "Primary health care services" include, but are not limited to:
(a)  services of physicians, nurses, physician's assistants, and dentists
licensed to practice in this state under Title 58, Occupations and
Professions;
(b)  diagnostic and radiologic services;
(c)  preventive health services including, but not limited to, perinatal
services, well-child services, and other services that seek to prevent disease
or its consequences;
(d)  emergency medical services;
(e)  preventive dental services; and
(f)  pharmaceutical services.
